Nevada, session 83, SB301-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 338.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
338.040 1. Except as otherwise provided by specific statute,
workers who are:
(a) Employed at the site of a public work [;] or employed by
delivering or removing construction material or structures to or
from the site of a public work; and
(b) Necessary in the execution of the contract for the public
work,
 are deemed to be employed on public works.
2. The Labor Commissioner shall adopt regulations to define
the circumstances under which a worker is:
(a) Employed at the site of a public work [;] or employed by
delivering or removing construction material or structures to or
from the site of a public work; and
(b) Necessary in the execution of the contract for the public
work.
3. For the purposes of this section, “construction material or
structures” means aggregate, asphalt and concrete.
Sec. 1.3. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of the Labor Commissioner in the
Department of Business and Industry the sum of $144,576 for
personnel, operating, travel and information services costs for
compliance and enforcement duties related to the provisions of this
act.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2025, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 19, 2025, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 19, 2025.
Sec. 2. Any regulations adopted by the Labor Commissioner
that conflict with NRS 338.040, as amended by section 1 of this act,
are void. The Legislative Counsel shall remove those regulations
from the Nevada Administrative Code as soon as practicable after
the date on which this section becomes effective.
Sec. 3. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Section 1.3 of this act becomes effective on July 1, 2024.
-
*SB301_R3*

– 3 –
3. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective on July 1,
2025.
H
-
*SB301_R3*